California, session 20252026, SB77.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25724 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25724. (a) (1) Beginning no later than the 2024–25 fiscal year, the Department of General Services shall ensure that at least 50 percent of the light-duty vehicles purchased for the state vehicle fleet each fiscal year are zero-emission vehicles.(2) The Department of General Services shall require a supplier of zero-emission light-duty vehicles purchased for the state vehicle fleet to certify that the raw materials used in the manufacturing of the zero-emission light-duty vehicles, including, but not limited to, aluminum, cobalt and lithium, come from mining operations that are free of child labor.(3) A supplier of zero-emission light-duty vehicles purchased for the state vehicle fleet shall provide to the Department of General Services the locations where the raw materials used in the production of the zero-emission light-duty vehicles were mined and the average hourly wage of the workers that mined the raw materials.(b) This section does not apply to vehicles that have special performance requirements necessary for the protection of public safety, as defined by the Department of General Services.(c) (1) If the Department of General Services determines that it cannot meet the needs of the state while fulfilling the requirements of this section, the department shall hold a public hearing to make that finding, notify the Secretary of State of the finding, and cease to implement this section.(2) The Department of General Services may base the finding required pursuant to paragraph (1) on a determination that fulfilling the requirements of this section would result in costs that are not substantially absorbable by the department when purchasing those light-duty vehicles.(d) The Department of General Services shall post on its internet website the information required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and a list of the zero-emission light-duty vehicles purchased for the state vehicle fleet that are certified to be made with raw materials that come from mining operations that are free of child labor.